Hawaii statutes.
[§286-102.3] Commercial drivers
under the age of twenty-one. A person is qualified to drive commercially
in the State in intrastate commerce if the person:

(1) Is at least nineteen years of age;

(2) Is in compliance with title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations, part 390-396, subpart B, except section 391.11(b)(1) in the case
of an intrastate driver involved in intrastate commerce in the State;

(3) Only operates a category 3 vehicle as defined in
section 286-102(b)(3);

(4) Shall not transport hazardous materials as
defined in section 286-2, nor passengers in a school vehicle as defined in
section 286-181; and

(5) Has had a category 3 state driver's license for
the two years immediately preceding driving commercially under this section,
with the following conditions:

(A) Has not had any license suspended,
revoked, or canceled; and

(B) Has not had any conviction for:

(i) Speeding excessively involving any speed of
fifteen miles per hour or more above the speed limit;

(ii) Driving recklessly, as defined by state or
local law or regulation, including but not limited to offenses of driving a
motor vehicle in wilful or wanton disregard for the safety of person or
property;

(iii) Making improper or erratic traffic lane
changes;

(iv) Following the vehicle ahead too closely; or

(v) Violating state or local law relating to
motor vehicle traffic control, excluding parking violations, arising in connection
with a fatal accident. [L 2007, c 288, §1]

Revision Note

This section was renumbered from §286-236.5.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next